Montana, session 2025, SB222.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Repealer. The following section of the Montana Code Annotated is
repealed:
5-7-310. Prohibition of lobbying by former government personnel.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 222